Florida, session 2026, HB835.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
38
39 Section 1. Section 1002.206, Florida Statutes, is amended
40 to read:
41 1002.206 Freedom of speech and religious expression in
42 public schools.—
43 (1) This section may be cited as the "Florida Student and
44 School Personnel First Amendment and Religious Liberties Act."
45 (2) A school district may not discriminate against a
46 student, parent, or school personnel on the basis of a religious
47 viewpoint or religious expression. A school district may not
48 discriminate against or penalize a student on the basis of
49 expressing a religious, political, or ideological viewpoint or
50 for engaging in religious, political, or ideological expression
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb835-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 835 2026
51 in the same time, place, and manner and to the same extent that
52 other similarly situated students may engage in speech or
53 express views at a public school. A school district shall treat
54 a student's voluntary expression of a religious, political, or
55 ideological viewpoint on an otherwise permissible subject in the
56 same manner that the school district treats a student's
57 voluntary expression of any other a secular viewpoint.
58 (3)(a) A student may express his or her religious,
59 political, or ideological beliefs in coursework, artwork, and
60 other written and oral assignments free from discrimination or
61 academic penalty. A student's homework and classroom assignments
62 shall be evaluated, regardless of their religious, political, or
63 ideological content, based on expected academic standards
64 relating to the course curriculum and requirements. A student
65 may not be penalized or rewarded based on the religious,
66 political, or ideological content of his or her work if the
67 coursework, artwork, or other written or oral assignments
68 require a student's viewpoint to be expressed.
69 (b) A student may wear clothing, accessories, and jewelry
70 that display a religious, political, or ideological message or
71 symbol in the same manner and to the same extent that other
72 secular types of clothing, accessories, and jewelry that display
73 messages or symbols are permitted to be worn.
74 (4)(a) A student may pray or engage in or organize
75 religious, political, or ideological activities or religious,
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb835-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 835 2026
76 political, or ideological expression before, during, and after
77 the school day in the same manner and to the same extent that a
78 student may engage in other secular activities or expression. A
79 student may organize prayer groups or, religious, political, or
80 ideological clubs, and other religious, political, or
81 ideological gatherings before, during, and after the school day
82 in the same manner and to the same extent that a student is
83 permitted to organize other secular activities, clubs,
84 gatherings, and groups. A school district may not discriminate
85 against a student club or group based on:
86 1. The religious, political, or ideological viewpoints
87 expressed by the students or the club; or
88 2. Any requirement that the leaders or members of the club
89 affirm and adhere to the club's sincerely held beliefs, comply
90 with the club's standards of conduct, or further the club's
91 mission or purpose, as defined by the student club.
92 (b)1. A school district may not prevent school personnel
93 from participating in religious activities on school grounds
94 that are initiated by students at reasonable times before or
95 after the school day if such activities are voluntary and do not
96 conflict with the responsibilities or assignments of such
97 personnel.
98 2. A school district shall comply with the federal
99 requirements in Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, which
100 prohibits an employer from discriminating against an employee on
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb835-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 835 2026
101 the basis of religion.
102 (c) A school district shall give a religious, political,
103 or ideological group access to the same school facilities for
104 assembling as given to other secular groups without
105 discrimination based on the religious, political, or ideological
106 content of the group's expression. A group that meets for prayer
107 or other religious, political, or ideological speech may
108 advertise or announce its meetings in the same manner and to the
109 same extent that another a secular group may advertise or
110 announce its meetings.
111 (5)(a) A school district shall adopt a policy that
112 establishes a limited public forum for student speakers at any
113 school event at which a student is to speak publicly. The
114 limited public forum policy shall require the school district
115 to:
116 1. Provide the forum in a manner that does not
117 discriminate against a student's voluntary expression of a
118 religious, political, or ideological viewpoint on an otherwise
119 permissible subject;
120 2. Provide a method based on neutral criteria for the
121 selection of student speakers at school events, activities, and
122 graduation ceremonies;
123 3. Ensure that a student speaker does not engage in
124 obscene, vulgar, offensively lewd, or indecent speech; and
125 4. State in written or oral form that the student's speech
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb835-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 835 2026
126 does not reflect the endorsement, sponsorship, position, or
127 expression of the school district.
128 (b) The school district shall deliver the disclaimer
129 required in subparagraph (a)4. at all graduation events and any
130 other event at which a student speaks publicly.
131 (c) Student expression of a religious, political, or
132 ideological viewpoint on an otherwise permissible subject may
133 not be excluded from the limited public forum.
134 (6) The Department of Education shall develop a model
135 policy regarding a limited public forum and voluntary expression
136 of religious, political, or ideological viewpoints by students
137 and school personnel in public schools pursuant to this section.
138 The department shall publish the model policy on its website.
139 Each district school board shall adopt and implement the
140 department's model policy.
141 (7) This section does not prevent a school district from
142 prohibiting, limiting, or restricting:
143 (a) Expression that the First Amendment of the United
144 States Constitution does not protect.
145 (b) Expression that is unwelcome, and so severe,
146 pervasive, and subjectively and objectively offensive, that a
147 student is effectively denied equal access to educational
148 opportunities or benefits provided by the school.
149 (c) Conduct that intentionally, materially, and
150 substantially disrupts:
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb835-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 835 2026
151 1. The operations of the school; or
152 2. The expressive activities of another person if that
153 activity is occurring on campus in a space reserved for that
154 activity under the exclusive use or control of a particular
155 student, group of students, or group or club.
156 (8)(a) Any person or student club or group who is harmed
157 by a violation of this section, or whose rights under this
158 section are violated, shall have a private cause of action
159 against the school district for declaratory and injunctive
160 relief, statutory punitive damages, reasonable attorney fees and
161 costs, and any other appropriate relief.
162 (b) If a person or student club or group prevails in any
163 such action, the person or student club or group shall be
164 awarded statutory punitive damages in an amount of at least
165 $15,000, not to exceed $25,000.
166 (c) Any person or student club or group aggrieved by a
167 violation of this section may assert such violation as a defense
168 or counterclaim in any disciplinary action or in any civil or
169 administrative proceedings brought against such person or
170 student club or group.
171 (d) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to limit
172 any other remedies available to any student or student club or
173 group.
174 (e) A person or student club or group shall be required to
175 bring suit for violation of this section not later than 2 years
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb835-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 835 2026
176 after the day the cause of action accrues. For purposes of
177 calculating the 2-year limitation period, each day that the
178 violation persists, and each day that a policy in violation of
179 this section remains in effect, shall constitute a new day that
180 the cause of action has accrued.
181 (9)(a) A school district that violates this section is not
182 immune from suit or liability for such violation and is not
183 immune from civil suit in federal court.
184 (b) The state waives immunity under the Eleventh Amendment
185 of the United States Constitution and consents to suit in a
186 federal court for lawsuits arising out of this section. A school
187 that violates this section is not immune from suit or liability
188 for the violation.
189 (10) If any provision of this section or its application
190 to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity
191 does not affect other provisions or applications of this section
192 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
193 application, and to this end the provisions of this act are
194 severable.
195 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb835-00